Utah statutes.
31A-26-206.   Continuing education requirements.
(1)  Pursuant to this section, the commissioner shall by rule prescribe
continuing education requirements for each class of license under Section
31A-26-204.
(2) (a)  The commissioner shall impose continuing education requirements in
accordance with a two-year licensing period in which the licensee meets the
requirements of this Subsection (2).
(b) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b)(iii), the continuing
education requirements shall require:
(A)  that a licensee complete 24 credit hours of continuing education for
every two-year licensing period;
(B)  that three of the 24 credit hours described in Subsection (2)(b)(i)(A) be
ethics courses; and
(C)  that the licensee complete at least half of the required hours through
classroom hours of insurance-related instruction.
(ii)  The hours not completed through classroom hours in accordance with
Subsection (2)(b)(i)(C) may be obtained through:
(A)  home study;
(B)  video recording;
(C)  experience credit; or
(D)  other methods provided by rule.
(iii)  Notwithstanding Subsections (2)(b)(i)(A) and (B), a title insurance
adjuster is required to complete 12 credit hours of continuing education for
every two-year licensing period, with three of the credit hours being ethics
courses.
(c)  A licensee may obtain continuing education hours at any time during the
two-year licensing period.
(d) (i)  Beginning May 3, 1999, a licensee is exempt from the continuing
education requirements of this section if:
(A)  the licensee was first licensed before April 1, 1970;
(B)  the licensee requests an exemption from the department; and
(C)  the department approves the exemption.
(ii)  If the department approves the exemption under Subsection (2)(d)(i), the
licensee is not required to apply again for the exemption.
(e)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commissioner shall by rule:
(i)  publish a list of insurance professional designations whose continuing
education requirements can be used to meet the requirements for continuing
education under Subsection (2)(b); and
(ii)  authorize professional adjuster associations to:
(A)  offer qualified programs for all classes of licenses on a geographically
accessible basis; and
(B)  collect reasonable fees for funding and administration of the continuing
education programs, subject to the review and approval of the commissioner.
(f) (i)  The fees permitted under Subsection (2)(e)(ii)(B) that are charged to
fund and administer a program shall reasonably relate to the costs of
administering the program.
(ii)  Nothing in this section shall prohibit a provider of continuing
education programs or courses from charging fees for attendance at courses
offered for continuing education credit.
(iii)  The fees permitted under Subsection (2)(e)(ii)(B) that are charged  for
attendance at an association program may be less for an association member,
based on the member's affiliation expense, but shall preserve the right of a
nonmember to attend without affiliation.
(3)  The requirements of this section apply only to licensees who are natural
persons.
(4)  The requirements of this section do not apply to members of the Utah
State Bar.
(5)  The commissioner shall designate courses that satisfy the requirements of
this section, including those presented by insurers.
(6)  A nonresident adjuster is considered to have satisfied this state's
continuing education requirements if:
(a)  the nonresident adjuster satisfies the nonresident producer's home
state's continuing education requirements for a licensed insurance adjuster;
and
(b)  on the same basis the nonresident adjuster's home state considers
satisfaction of Utah's continuing education requirements for a producer as
satisfying the continuing education requirements of the home state.
(7)  A licensee subject to this section shall keep documentation of completing
the continuing education requirements of this section for two years after the
end of the two-year licensing period to which the continuing education
requirement applies.
